District of Columbia statutes.
29-401.20

Definition.

For the purposes of this part, the term “corporate action” means:

(1)

The election, appointment, designation, or other selection and the suspension, removal, or expulsion of members, delegates, directors, members of a designated body, or officers of a nonprofit corporation; or

(2)

The taking of any action on any matter that is required under this chapter or under any other provision of law to be, or which under the articles of incorporation or bylaws may be, submitted for action to the members, delegates, directors, members of a designated body, or officers of a nonprofit corporation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720